North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-60.3 Agricultural Products Utilization Commission [Repealed]

54-60.3-01.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Composition — Appointment.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 58, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

54-60.3-02.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Authority.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 58, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

54-60.3-03.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Meetings — Personnel — Reports.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 58, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

54-60.3-04.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Reimbursement — Compensation.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 58, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

54-60.3-05.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Administrative expenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 58, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

54-60.3-06.
Agricultural products utilization fund — Purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 58, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.